Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. In General
§ 33-3-131.
Unlawful use of terms; advertising; prima facie evidence of violation.

The display or uttering by a person of a card, sign, advertisement or other printed, engraved or written instrument or device bearing a person’s name in conjunction with the words “certified public accountant” or the abbreviation “CPA” is prima facie evidence in any action brought under W.S.

33-3-129

or

33-3-130

that the person whose name is so displayed caused or procured the display or uttered the card, sign, advertisement or other printed, engraved or written instrument or device and that the person is holding himself out to be a certified public accountant. In any action, evidence of the commission of a single act prohibited by this act is sufficient to justify an injunction or a conviction without evidence of a general course of conduct.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.82.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-3-102(a)(xv).

Purpose. —

Section 2, ch. 179, Laws 1975, reads: “The purpose of this act is to upgrade the professional standards of certified public accountants and to provide the board with the means of enforcement. The provisions of this act apply only to certified public accountants.”

Severability. —

Section 3, ch. 179, Laws 1975, reads: “If any provision of this act is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provisions; and to that end, the provisions of this act are severable.”

§ 33-3-132.
Practice monitoring program.

As used in this article:

“Peer review” means a study, appraisal or review of one (1) or more aspects of the professional work of a person or firm in the practice of certified public accountancy by a person who holds certificates and who is not affiliated with the person or firm being reviewed;

“Practice monitoring program” means a program consisting of peer reviews which are conducted in conformity with standards promulgated by the peer review committees of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants or successor organization;

“Reviewer” means a certified public accountant active in public practice and fulfilling requirements for peer reviewers as established by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants or successor organization.

The board may require, on a uniform basis, that certificate and permit holders undergo practice monitoring conducted in a manner the board may specify by rule and regulation.

Except in any action before the board to enforce its rules and regulations regarding the practice monitoring program, any report, statement, memorandum, transcript, finding, record or working paper prepared and any opinion formulated in connection with any practice monitoring program, which is in the possession of the board or the reviewer, shall be considered privileged and shall not be subject to discovery, subpoena or other means of legal compulsion for release to any person or entity or be admissible as evidence in any judicial or administrative proceeding.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 49, § 1; 2005, ch. 1, § 1; 2009, ch. 99, § 1; 2019 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(iii), deleted “licensed” preceding “certified public accountant”; in (b), inserted “certificate and” preceding “permit”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “certified” preceding “public accountancy” in (a)(i).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, at the end of (a)(ii) added "or successor organization;" and (a)(iii) added "or successor organization."